Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201581-1415
Commission, defined.

As used in sections 81-1415 to 81-1426.01, unless the context otherwise requires: Commission means the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice.

Laws 1969, c. 774, § 1, p. 2932;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 84.